California, session 20252026, SB1372.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 5845.8 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:5845.8. (a) The commission shall biennially report every two years to the Senate and Assembly Committees on Health, Senate Budget Subcommittee on Health and Human Services, and Assembly Budget Subcommittee on Health and Human Services the outcomes for those receiving community mental health services under a full service partnership model. The initial report shall be submitted no later than November 15, 2022. The commission may also issue a progress report in a year when it is not otherwise due if the commission deems the report to be necessary.(b) The report shall include, but not be limited to, information regarding persons eligible for full service partnerships, including summary information relating to enrollees and nonenrollees with respect to the community mental health services they receive and their experience with all of the following:(1) Incarceration or criminalization.(2) Housing status or homelessness.(3) Hospitalization, emergency room utilization, and crisis service utilization.(c) The report shall also include information regarding individuals who separate from a full service partnership, including, but not limited to, analysis of the reasons for separation and, to the extent possible, the community mental health services received and the statuses or experiences of these individuals regarding the outcomes identified in subdivision (b) for a period of 12 months following separation.(d) The report shall also assess the degree to which the individuals most in need are accessing services and maintaining participation in a full service partnership or other programs providing similar services.(e) The commission shall report any barriers to receiving the data relevant to completing this report and include recommendations to strengthen California’s use of full service partnerships to reduce incarceration, hospitalization, and homelessness.(f) In doing this work, the commission shall consult with the California mental health community, including, but not limited to, consumers, relatives of consumers, providers, and other subject matter experts.